Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Reports

§ 17-16-1620.
Financial statements for shareholders.

A corporation shall furnish, upon request, to its shareholders annual financial statements, which may be consolidated or combined statements of the corporation and one (1) or more of its subsidiaries, as appropriate, that include a balance sheet as of the end of the fiscal year, an income statement for that year, and a statement of changes in shareholders’ equity for the year unless that information appears elsewhere in the financial statements. If financial statements are prepared for the corporation on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles, the annual financial statements shall also be prepared on that basis. If detailed financial statements are not prepared for the corporation on an annual basis, then a copy of its federal income tax return will satisfy the requirements of this section.

If the annual financial statements are reported upon by a public accountant, his report shall accompany them. If not, the statements shall be accompanied by a statement of the president or the person responsible for the corporation’s accounting records:

Stating his reasonable belief whether the statements were prepared on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles and, if not, describing the basis of preparation; and

Describing any respects in which the statements were not prepared on a basis of accounting consistent with the statements prepared for the preceding year.

A corporation shall mail, upon request, the annual financial statements to each shareholder within one hundred twenty (120) days after the close of each fiscal year. Thereafter, on written request from a shareholder who was not mailed the statements, the corporation shall mail the shareholder the latest financial statements.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “the shareholder” for “him” in (c).

§ 17-16-1621.
[Reserved.]

§ 17-16-1622.
Other reports to shareholders.

If a corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to a director under W.S.

17-16-851

through

17-16-854

in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, the corporation shall report the indemnification or advance in writing to the shareholders with or before the notice of the next shareholders’ meeting.

If a corporation issues or authorizes the issuance of shares for promissory notes or for promises to render services in the future, the corporation shall report in writing to the shareholders the number of shares authorized or issued, and the consideration received by the corporation, with or before the notice of the next shareholders’ meeting.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.